Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.020

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5337-S2.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adult day services" means care and services provided to a nonresident individual by the assisted living facility on the assisted living facility premises, for a period of time not to exceed ten continuous hours, and does not involve an overnight stay.

(2) "Assisted living facility" means any home or other institution, however named, which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or implied purpose of providing housing, basic services, and assuming general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the residents, and may also provide domiciliary care, consistent with chapter 142, Laws of 2004, to seven or more residents after July 1, 2000. However, an assisted living facility that is licensed for three to six residents prior to or on July 1, 2000, may maintain its assisted living facility license as long as it is continually licensed as an assisted living facility. "Assisted living facility" shall not include facilities certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor any home, institution or section thereof which is otherwise licensed and regulated under the provisions of state law providing specifically for the licensing and regulation of such home, institution or section thereof. Nor shall it include any independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care retirement communities, or other similar living situations including those subsidized by the department of housing and urban development.

(3) "Basic services" means housekeeping services, meals, nutritious snacks, laundry, and activities.

(4) "Department" means the state department of social and health services.

(5) "Domiciliary care" means: Assistance with activities of daily living provided by the assisted living facility either directly or indirectly; or health support services, if provided directly or indirectly by the assisted living facility; or intermittent nursing services, if provided directly or indirectly by the assisted living facility.

(6) "General responsibility for the safety and well-being of the resident" means the provision of the following: Prescribed general low sodium diets; prescribed general diabetic diets; prescribed mechanical soft foods; emergency assistance; monitoring of the resident; arranging health care appointments with outside health care providers and reminding residents of such appointments as necessary; coordinating health care services with outside health care providers consistent with RCW 18.20.380; assisting the resident to obtain and maintain glasses, hearing aids, dentures, canes, crutches, walkers, wheelchairs, and assistive communication devices; observation of the resident for changes in overall functioning; blood pressure checks as scheduled; responding appropriately when there are observable or reported changes in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning; or medication assistance as permitted under RCW 69.41.085 and as defined in RCW 69.41.010.

(7) "Legal representative" means a person or persons identified in RCW 7.70.065 who may act on behalf of the resident pursuant to the scope of their legal authority. The legal representative shall not be affiliated with the licensee, assisted living facility, or management company, unless the affiliated person is a family member of the resident.

(8) "Nonresident individual" means a person who resides in independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care retirement communities, or in other similar living environments or in an unlicensed room located within an assisted living facility. Nothing in this chapter prohibits nonresidents from receiving one or more of the services listed in RCW 18.20.030(5) or requires licensure as an assisted living facility when one or more of the services listed in RCW 18.20.030(5) are provided to nonresidents. A nonresident individual may not receive domiciliary care, as defined in this chapter, directly or indirectly by the assisted living facility and may not receive the items and services listed in subsection (6) of this section, except during the time the person is receiving adult day services as defined in this section.

(9) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.

(10) "Resident" means an individual who is not related by blood or marriage to the operator of the assisted living facility, and by reason of age or disability, chooses to reside in the assisted living facility and receives basic services and one or more of the services listed under general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the resident and may receive domiciliary care or respite care provided directly or indirectly by the assisted living facility and shall be permitted to receive hospice care through an outside service provider when arranged by the resident or the resident's legal representative under RCW 18.20.380.

(11) "Resident applicant" means an individual who is seeking admission to a licensed assisted living facility and who has completed and signed an application for admission, or such application for admission has been completed and signed in their behalf by their legal representative if any, and if not, then the designated representative if any.

(12) "Resident's representative" means a person designated voluntarily by a competent resident, in writing, to act in the resident's behalf concerning the care and services provided by the assisted living facility and to receive information from the assisted living facility, if there is no legal representative. The resident's competence shall be determined using the criteria in chapter 11.130 RCW. The resident's representative may not be affiliated with the licensee, assisted living facility, or management company, unless the affiliated person is a family member of the resident. The resident's representative shall not have authority to act on behalf of the resident once the resident is no longer competent.

(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

[ 2020 c 312 s 726. Prior: 2012 c 10 s 2; prior: 2011 c 366 s 2; 2006 c 242 s 1; 2004 c 142 s 1; 2003 c 231 s 2; 2000 c 47 s 1; 1998 c 272 s 14; 1991 c 3 s 34; 1989 c 329 s 1; 1985 c 213 s 4; 1979 c 141 s 25; 1957 c 253 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Conflict with federal requirements—2011 c 366: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state." [ 2011 c 366 s 9.]

Findings—Purpose—2011 c 366: "The legislature has a long history of supporting seniors where they live whether it is at home or in a licensed care facility. It is widely recognized that the consumer of senior services and long-term care of tomorrow will have different demands and expectations for the type and manner of supportive and health care services that they receive. Cost efficiencies must and can be achieved within the health care system. Through the use of care coaches, technology-supported health and wellness programs, and by allowing greater flexibility for the specialization and use of nursing facility beds, costly hospitalizations and rehospitalizations can be reduced and the entry to licensed care settings can be delayed." [ 2011 c 366 s 1.]

Severability—2006 c 242: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2006 c 242 s 4.]

Effective dates—2004 c 142: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 26, 2004], except that sections 1 through 10 and 12 of this act take effect September 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 142 s 18.]

Findings—2003 c 231: "The legislature finds and declares that, in keeping with the traditional concept of the dignity of the individual in our democratic society, the older citizens of this state and persons with disabilities are entitled to live in comfort, honor, and dignity in a manner that maximizes freedom and independence.

The legislature further finds that licensed boarding homes are an essential component of home and community-based services, and that the noninstitutional nature of this care setting must be preserved and protected by ensuring a regulatory structure that focuses on the actual care and services provided to residents, consumer satisfaction, and continuous quality improvement.

The legislature also finds that residents and consumers of services in licensed boarding homes should be encouraged to exercise maximum independence, and the legislature declares that the state's rules for licensed boarding homes must also be designed to encourage individual dignity, autonomy, and choice.

The legislature further finds that consumers should be afforded access to affordable long-term care services in licensed boarding homes, and believes that care delivery must remain responsive to consumer preferences. Residents and consumers in licensed boarding homes should be afforded the right to self-direct care, and this right should be reflected in the rules governing licensed boarding homes." [ 2003 c 231 s 1.]

Effective date—2003 c 231: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 12, 2003]." [ 2003 c 231 s 12.]

Effective date—2000 c 47: "This act takes effect July 1, 2000." [ 2000 c 47 s 11.]

Findings—Severability—Effective date—1998 c 272: See notes following RCW 18.20.230.

Savings—Effective date—1985 c 213: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.